Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.36.050

Reckless endangerment.

(1) A person is guilty of reckless endangerment when he or she recklessly engages in conduct not amounting to drive-by shooting but that creates a substantial risk of death or serious physical injury to another person.

(2) Reckless endangerment is a gross misdemeanor.

[ 1997 c 338 s 45; 1989 c 271 s 110; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.36.050.]

NOTES:

Finding—Evaluation—Report—1997 c 338: See note following RCW 13.40.0357.

Severability—Effective dates—1997 c 338: See notes following RCW 5.60.060.

Finding—Intent—1989 c 271 ss 102, 109, and 110: "The legislature finds that increased trafficking in illegal drugs has increased the likelihood of "drive-by shootings." It is the intent of the legislature in sections 102, 109, and 110 of this act to categorize such reckless and criminal activity into a separate crime and to provide for an appropriate punishment." [ 1989 c 271 s 108.]

Application—1989 c 271 ss 101-111: See note following RCW 9.94A.510.

Severability—1989 c 271: See note following RCW 9.94A.510.

Criminal history and driving record: RCW 46.61.513.